Oklahoma, session 2025, SB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.31 of Title 21, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Firearm” shall have the same definition as provided in


Section 1289.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Firearm suppressor” means any device designed, made, or


adapted to muffle the report of a firearm that is being discharged;


3. “Generic and insignificant part” means an item that has


manufacturing or consumer product applications other than inclusion


in a firearm suppressor. The term includes, but is not limited to,


a spring, screw, nut, or pin; and

Req. No. 693 Page 1


4. “Manufacture” means forging, casting, machining, or another


process for working a material.


B. 1. A firearm suppressor that is manufactured in this state


and remains in this state shall not be subject to federal law or


federal regulation including registration under the authority of the


United States Congress to regulate interstate commerce.


2. A basic material from which a firearm suppressor is


manufactured in this state, including unmachined steel, is not a


firearm suppressor and is not subject to federal regulation under


the authority of the United States Congress to regulate interstate


commerce as if it were a firearm suppressor.


3. A firearm suppressor manufactured and sold in this state


must have the words “Made in Oklahoma” clearly stamped, machined, or


engraved on it.


C. For purposes of this section, a firearm suppressor is


manufactured in this state if the item is manufactured:


1. In this state from basic materials;


2. Without the inclusion of any part imported from another


state other than a generic and insignificant part as defined in this


section; and


3. Without regard to whether a firearm imported into this state


from another state is attached to or used in conjunction with the


suppressor.



Req. No. 693 Page 2


D. No agency, municipality, or other political subdivision


shall adopt a rule, order, ordinance, or policy under which the


entity enforces any regulation that purports to regulate a firearm


suppressor if the statute, order, rule, or regulation imposes a


prohibition, restriction, or other regulation that does not exist


under the laws of this state.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-693 CN 12/27/2024 11:12:45 AM































Req. No. 693 Page 3